Utah statutes.
34A-1-203.   Commissioner -- Jurisdiction over division directors -- Authority.

(1)  The commissioner has administrative jurisdiction over each division.

(2)  To effectuate greater efficiency and economy in the operations of the commission, the commissioner may:

(a)  make changes in personnel and service functions in the divisions under the commissioner's administrative jurisdiction; and

(b)  authorize designees to perform appropriate responsibilities.

(3)  To facilitate management of the commission, the commissioner may establish offices necessary to implement this title or to perform functions such as budgeting, planning, data processing, and personnel administration.



Enacted by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

